Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,109
Drug product selection; purposes of act.

The purposes of the Nebraska Drug Product Selection Act are to provide for the drug product selection of equivalent drug products or interchangeable biological products and to promote the greatest possible use of such products.

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-5401.02;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 60;

Laws 2017, LB481, § 12.